Wyoming, session 2026, SF0120.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) There is appropriated two hundred thirty-seven
million eight hundred sixty-five thousand one hundred
twenty-three dollars ($237,865,123.00) from the public
school foundation program account to the state construction
department for major maintenance payments to school
SF0120

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0453
districts in accordance with W.S. 21-15-109. This
appropriation shall be subject to the following:

(i) One million one hundred twenty-two thousand
four hundred dollars ($1,122,400.00) shall be for the
period beginning on the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028;

(ii) Two hundred thirty-six million seven
hundred forty-two thousand seven hundred twenty-three
dollars ($236,742,723.00) shall be for the period beginning
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028;

(iii) This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation after distribution to school districts in
accordance with W.S. 21-15-109 shall revert to the public
school foundation program account on June 30, 2028.

SF0120

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0453
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0120